Massachusetts, session 194th, H2038.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13 ½ of Chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following subsection:-
“(a) The court shall order a defendant convicted of vehicular homicide while intoxicated
resulting in the death of a parent or guardian to pay restitution to the victim’s surviving children.
(1) The court shall determine an amount to be paid monthly for the support of the
child until the child reaches the age of 18 or graduates high school, whichever comes later.
(2) The defendant shall not be required to pay restitution under this article to an
individual who is 19 years of age or older, unless the individual pursues higher education where
the defendant shall be required to pay restitution until the individual reaches the age of 22 or
graduates from a higher education program, whichever comes first.
of 2

(3) The court shall determine an amount for restitution that is reasonable and
necessary to support the child, considering all relevant factors including: the financial needs and
resources of the child; the financial needs and resources of the surviving parent or guardian; the
standard of living to which the child is accustomed; the physical and emotional condition of the
child and the child’s educational needs; the child’s physical and legal custody arrangements; and
the reasonable, work-related child care expenses of the surviving parent or guardian, if
applicable.
(b) The order shall require restitution payments to be made to the surviving parents or
guardian.
(c) If a defendant ordered to pay restitution under this article is unable to make the
required restitution payments due to incarceration, the defendant shall begin payments no later
than 1 year following their release. The defendant may enter into a payment plan to address any
arrearage that exists on the date of the defendant’s release.
of 2